Washington statutes.
RCW 19.09.400

Attorney general—Investigations—Publication of information.

The attorney general, in the attorney general's discretion, may:

(1) Annually, or more frequently, make such public or private investigations within or without this state as the attorney general deems necessary to determine whether any registration should be granted, denied, revoked, or suspended, or whether any entity has violated or is about to violate a provision of this chapter or any rule adopted or order issued under this chapter, or to aid in the enforcement of this chapter or in the prescribing of rules and forms under this chapter; and

(2) Publish information concerning a violation of this chapter or a rule adopted or order issued under this chapter.

[ 2011 c 199 s 27; 1993 c 471 s 18.]